Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-718
Contracts and agreements authorized.

The commission may enter into contracts, memoranda of understanding, or cooperative agreements with the participating cooperators to jointly conduct or act as the agent for the commission in landowner contact and other operations relating to the register.

Laws 1989, LB 251, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1405;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 332.